North Carolina statutes. Chapter 128. Offices and Public Officers.
Article 3. Retirement System for Counties, Cities and Towns.
§ 128-31.
Exemptions from execution; employing unit to offset amount owed by member or beneficiary.

Except for the applications of the provisions of

G.S. 110-136

, and

G.S. 110-136.3

et seq., and in connection with a court-ordered equitable distribution under

G.S. 50-20

, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, or a retirement allowance, to the return of contributions, the pension, annuity or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this Article, and the moneys in the various funds created by this Article, are exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever, and shall be unassignable except as in this Article specifically otherwise provided. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, application for System approval of a domestic relations order dividing a person’s interest under the Retirement System shall be accompanied by an order consistent with the system-designed template order provided on the System’s Web site. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, the Retirement System shall only make payment of a share of the member’s retirement benefits to the member’s former spouse based upon a domestic relations order, and the former spouse shall not be permitted to receive a share of the member’s retirement benefits until the member begins to receive the benefits, consistent with the system-designed template order. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, the former spouse shall not be entitled to any type or form of benefit or any option not otherwise available to the member. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, for orders entered on or after January 1, 2015, payment to a member’s former spouse pursuant to any such domestic relations order shall be limited to the lifetime of that former spouse and, upon the death of that former spouse, the former spouse’s share shall revert to the member.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, any overpayment of benefits or erroneous payments to a member in a State-administered retirement system, the Disability Salary Continuation Plan, or the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina, including any benefits paid to, or State Health Plan premiums or claims paid on behalf of, any member who is later determined to have been ineligible for those benefits or unentitled to those amounts, may be offset against any retirement allowance, return of contributions or any other right accruing under this Chapter to the same person, the person’s estate, or designated beneficiary.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, if the member or beneficiary is an employee of an employing unit of the State or any political subdivision of the State, then any overpayment of benefits or erroneous payments to, or on behalf of, the member or beneficiary shall be offset against the net wages of the employee. If a member or beneficiary owes an amount to the Retirement System, has been notified of this amount in writing, and has not entered into a payment plan acceptable to the Retirement System, then the Retirement System shall notify the member or beneficiary’s employer of the amount owed. Upon receipt of this notice from the Retirement System, the employer shall offset the amount owed against not less than ten percent (10%) of the net wages of the member or beneficiary until the Retirement System notifies the employer that the amount owed has been paid in full. The Retirement System’s notice shall be prima facie evidence that the amount owed is valid and, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the employer has no obligation to verify the amount owed. The employer shall provide no more than 30 days’ but not less than 14 days’ written notice to the member or beneficiary prior to beginning the offset. The employer shall remit all amounts offset under this subsection to the Retirement System in intervals corresponding with its regular pay periods. If an employer fails to adhere to the provisions of this section, then the Retirement System shall, after notice to the employer of its failure to cooperate, be entitled to seek recovery of any amounts due directly from the employer.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the Retirement System’s ability to pursue alternative judicial remedies against a member or a beneficiary, including the pursuit of a judgment and lien against real property.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 11; 1985, c. 402; c. 649, s. 5; 1989, c. 665, s. 3; c. 792, s. 2.4; 2005-91, s. 11; 2013-405, s. 4(b); 2014-112, s. 5(b); 2017-135, s. 9(b); 2018-52, s. 2(c); 2019-172, s. 1.2.

§ 128-32.
Protection against fraud.

Any person who shall knowingly make any false statement or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of this Retirement System in any attempt to defraud such System as a result of such act shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Should any change or error in the records result in any member or beneficiary receiving from the Retirement System more or less than he would have been entitled to receive had their records been correct, the Board of Trustees shall correct such error, and as far as practicable, shall adjust the payment in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 12; 1993, c. 539, s. 945; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 128-32.1.
Failure to respond.

If a member fails to respond within 120 days after preliminary option figures and the Form 6-E or Form 7-E are transmitted to the member, or if a member fails to respond within 120 days after the effective date of retirement, whichever is later, the Form 6 or Form 7 shall be null and void; the retirement system shall not be liable for any benefits due on account of the voided application, and a new application must be filed establishing a subsequent effective date of retirement. If an applicant for disability retirement fails to furnish requested additional medical information within 90 days following such request, the application shall be declared null and void under the same conditions outlined above, unless the applicant is eligible for early or service retirement in which case the application shall be processed accordingly, using the same effective date as would have been used had the application for disability retirement been approved. The Director of the Retirement Systems Division, acting on behalf of the Board of Trustees, may extend the 120-day limitation provided for in this section when a member has suffered incapacitation such that a reasonable person would not have expected the member to be able to complete the required paperwork within the regular deadline, or when an omission by the Retirement Systems Division prevents the member from having sufficient time to meet the regular deadline.

History.

2005-91, s. 12; 2009-66, s. 4(a); 2010-72, s. 6(b); 2016-108, s. 3(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 4(a), effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence, substituted “the Form 6-E are mailed, the Form 6 shall” for “Form 6-E, Election of Benefits, are mailed, the Form 6, Application for Service, Early, or Disability Retirement, shall”, and added the last sentence.

Session Laws 2010-72, s. 6(b), effective July 1, 2010, in the first sentence, substituted “respond within 120 days” for “respond in any way within 90 days,” and substituted “Form 6-E or Form 7-E are mailed, or if a member fails to respond within 120 days after the effective date of retirement, whichever is later, the Form 6 or Form 7” for “Form 6-E are mailed, the Form 6,” and, in the last sentence, substituted “120-day limitation” for “90-day limitation.”

Session Laws 2016-108, s. 3(b), effective July 22, 2016, substituted “transmitted to the member” for “mailed” in the first sentence.

§ 128-33.
Certain laws not applicable to members.

Subject to the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 135 of Volume 17 of the General Statutes, as amended, no other provision of law in any other statute which provides wholly or partly at the expense of any county, city or town for pensions or retirement benefits for employees of the said county, city or town, their widows, or other dependents shall apply to members or beneficiaries of the Retirement System established by this Article.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 13; 1955, c. 1153, s. 8.

§ 128-33.1.
Public records held by the Retirement System.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Employment-related information. — As defined in G.S. 126-22(b)(3).

Personal information. — As defined in G.S. 126-22(b)(3).

Retirement file. — Any employment-related, retirement-related, or personal information of members in a State-administered retirement plan gathered by the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer.

Retirement-related information. — Information including membership and service details, benefit payment information, and other information the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer deems necessary to administer a retirement plan.

Member retirement files are not subject to inspection and examination as authorized by

G.S. 132-6

except as provided in G.S. 135-6(p), G.S. 128-28(q), and subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section.

The following information regarding members and individuals in receipt of a recurring monthly benefit, if held by the Retirement System, is public subject to subsection (d) of this section:

Name.

Age.

Date of membership in the applicable Retirement System, first service earned date, date of first enrollment, date of first employment, and date of retirement.

The terms of any contract by which the member is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the Retirement System has the written contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession.

Current or most recently held position or title.

Compensation and other relevant remuneration history and benefits paid.

Date, general description, and type of each change and the corresponding employing agency.

The office or station to which the member is currently assigned, if any.

The record of benefit payments made by one of the Retirement Systems or Disability Benefits Programs administered by the Department of State Treasurer to a member or to the survivor, beneficiary, or alternate payee of a member.

Purchases of educational leave.

Subject only to rules and policies for the safekeeping of member retirement files adopted by the Board of Trustees, every person having custody of the retirement file information outlined in subsection (b) of this section shall permit the information to be inspected and examined and copies thereof made by any person during regular business hours. Any person who is denied access to any retirement file for the purpose of inspecting, examining, or copying the file has a right to compel compliance with the provisions of this section by application to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus or other appropriate relief.

The Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer may disclose the name and mailing address of former State and local government employees, former public school employees, or former community college employees to domiciled, nonprofit organizations representing 10,000 or more retired State government, local government, or public school employees.

(e1)

The Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer may disclose to employers or former employers that made a contribution for an employee or former employee to the Retirement System any information not public under this section regarding that employee necessary to conduct the business of the Retirement System. Employers and former employers in receipt of this information shall treat the information as confidential and this information shall not be a public record.

All information other than the information listed in subsection (c) of this section contained in a retirement file is confidential and not open for inspection and examination except to the following persons:

The member, or the member’s authorized agent, who may examine his or her own retirement file, except for any information concerning a medical disability, mental or physical, that a prudent physician would not divulge to a patient. A member’s medical record may be disclosed to a licensed physician in writing by the member.

A member of the General Assembly who may inspect and examine records under the authority of

G.S. 120-19

.

A party by authority of a proper court order may inspect and examine a particular confidential portion of a member’s retirement file.

Any public official or employee who knowingly and willfully permits any person to have access to or custody or possession of any portion of a retirement file designated as confidential by this section, unless the person is one specifically authorized by this section to have access thereto for inspection and examination, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined in the discretion of the court but not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Any person not specifically authorized by this section to have access to a retirement file designated as confidential by this section, who knowingly and willfully examines, removes, or copies any portion of a confidential retirement file, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in the discretion of the court but not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

2016-108, s. 2(c); 2018-85, s. 8(b); 2020-48, s. 1.16(d).

§ 128-34.
Transfer of members.

Any member of the North Carolina Governmental Employees’ Retirement System who leaves the service of his employer and enters the service of another employer participating in the North Carolina Governmental Employees’ Retirement System shall maintain his status as a member of the Retirement System and shall be credited with all of the amounts previously credited to his account in any of the funds under this Article, but the new employer shall be responsible for any accrued liability contribution payable on account of any prior service credit which such employee may have at the time of the transfer, and such employee shall be given such status and be credited with such service with the new employer as allowed with the former employer.

Any member of the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System shall be entitled prior to his retirement to transfer to this Retirement System his credits for membership and prior service in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System: Provided, the actual transfer of employment is made while he has an active account in the State System and such person shall request the State System to transfer his accumulated contributions, interest, and service credits to this Retirement System; provided further, the State System agrees to transfer to this Retirement System the amount of reserve held in the State System as the result of previous contributions of the employer on behalf of the transferring employee.

Any member whose services are terminated for any reason other than retirement or death who becomes employed by an employer participating in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System shall be entitled to transfer to the State System his credits for membership and prior service in this Retirement System in accordance with

G.S. 135-18.1

: Provided, the actual transfer of employment is made while he has an active account in this Retirement System and such persons shall request this Retirement System to transfer his accumulated contributions, interest, and service credits to the State System. When such request is made by a member who is entitled to make it and who becomes a member of the State System after July 1, 1969, this Retirement System will also transfer to the State System the amount of reserve held by this System as a result of previous contributions of the employer on behalf of the transferring employee.

The accumulated contributions and creditable service of any member whose service as an employee has been or is terminated other than by retirement or death and who, while still a member of this Retirement System, became or becomes a member, as defined in

G.S. 135-53(11)

, of the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System for a period of five or more years may, upon application of the member, be transferred from this Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. In order to effect the transfer of a member’s creditable service from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, there shall be transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System the sum of (i) the accumulated contributions of the member credited in the annuity savings fund and (ii) the amount of reserve held in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System as a result of previous contributions by the employer on behalf of the transferring member.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 14; 1971, c. 325, s. 20; 1973, c. 242, s. 11; 1999-237, s. 28.24(a).

§ 128-35.
Obligations of pension accumulation fund.

The maintenance of annuity reserves and pension reserves as provided for, and regular interest creditable to the various funds as provided in

G.S. 128-30

, and the payment of all pensions, annuities, retirement allowances, refunds and other benefits granted under the provisions of this Article, are hereby made obligations of the pension accumulation fund. All income, interest and dividends derived from deposits and investments authorized by this Article shall be used for the payment of said obligations of the said fund.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 15.

§ 128-36.
Local laws unaffected; when benefits begin to accrue.

Nothing in this Article shall have the effect of repealing any public-local or private act creating or authorizing the creation of any officers’ or employees’ retirement system in any county, city or town or prohibiting the enactment of any public-local or private act creating or authorizing the creation of any officers’ or employees’ retirement system in any county, city, or town. No payment on account of any benefit granted under the provisions of

G.S. 128-27

, subsections (a) to (d) inclusive, shall become effective or begin to accrue until the end of one year following the date the System is established nor shall any compulsory retirement be made during that period. The provisions of this Article shall apply only to those counties, cities or towns whose governing authorities voluntarily elect to be bound by same.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 16; 1941, c. 357, s. 9B; 1945, c. 526, s. 7A.

§ 128-36.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 318.

§ 128-37.
Membership of employees of district health departments or public health authorities.

Under such rules and regulations as the Board of Trustees shall establish and promulgate, the boards of county commissioners of any group of counties composing a district health department, or the governing board of any public health authority, or the board of county commissioners of any county as to county boards of health, or the governing authorities of any county and/or city as to city-county boards of health, may elect that employees of such health departments may be members of the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to the extent of that part of their compensation paid by the various counties composing said district health department.

History.

1949, c. 1012; 1951, c. 700; 1997-502, s. 4.

§ 128-37.1.
Membership of employees of county social services department.

Under such rules and regulations as the Board of Trustees shall establish and promulgate, the board of county commissioners of any county may elect that employees of the county social services department may be members of the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System; provided, that such membership may be elected jointly with such county health department employees as provided under

G.S. 128-37

.

History.

1959, c. 1179; 1969, c. 982.

§ 128-37.2.
Continued membership for certain fire departments.

In order to participate in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System after October 1, 2015, the charter or articles of incorporation of fire departments must include a provision that provides that the governing body of the local government entity that holds the contract with the highest dollar value to the fire department for provision of fire services shall have the authority to remove from office up to fifty percent (50%) plus one member of the Board of Trustees or Board of Directors of the fire department. Before exercising this authority, the local government entity shall notify the affected fire department and give the fire department the opportunity to be heard in a public meeting. When any fire department board member is removed, the resulting vacancy shall be filled pursuant to the bylaws of the fire department.

This section only applies to fire departments that commenced participation in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System between 1977 and 1992 pursuant to Chapter 316 of the Session Laws of 1977 and have contracts to provide fire protection to a city, county, or instrumentality of the State.

History.

2015-88, s. 10(a), (b).

§ 128-38.
Reservation of power to change.

The General Assembly reserves the right at any time and from time to time, and if deemed necessary or appropriate by said General Assembly in order to coordinate with any changes in the benefit and other provisions of the Social Security Act made after January 1, 1955, to modify or amend in whole or in part any or all of the provisions of the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

History.

1955, c. 1153, s. 9.

§ 128-38.1.
Termination or partial termination; discontinuance of contributions.

In the event of the termination or partial termination of the Retirement System or in the event of complete discontinuance of contributions under the Retirement System, the rights of all affected members to benefits accrued to the date of such termination, partial termination, or discontinuance, to the extent funded as of such date, or the amounts credited to the members’ accounts, shall be nonforfeitable and fully vested.

History.

1987, c. 177, s. 1(a), (b).

§ 128-38.2.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, compensation for any calendar year after 1988 in which employee or employer contributions are made and for which annual compensation is used for computing any benefit under this Article shall not exceed the higher of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 1989; provided the imposition of the limitation shall not reduce a member’s benefit below the amount determined as of December 31, 1988.Effective January 1, 1996, the annual compensation of a member taken into account for determining all benefits provided under this Article shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted pursuant to section 401(a)(17)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued under the Code. However, with respect to a person who became a member of the Retirement System prior to January 1, 1996, the imposition of this limitation on compensation shall not reduce the amount of compensation which may be taken into account for determining the benefits of that member under this Article below the amount of compensation which would have been recognized under the provisions of this Article in effect on July 1, 1993.Effective January 1, 2002, the annual compensation of a person, who became a member of the Retirement System on or after January 1, 1996, taken into account for determining all benefits accruing under this Article for any plan year after December 31, 2001, shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount otherwise set by the Internal Revenue Code or determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 2002.All the provisions in this subsection have been enacted to make clear that the Plan shall not base contributions or Plan benefits on annual compensation in excess of the limits prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted from time to time, subject to certain federal grandfathering rules.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual benefit payable on behalf of a member shall, if necessary, be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(b) and with respect to calendar years commencing prior to January 1, 2000, Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted by the Secretary of the Treasury or his delegate pursuant to Section 415(d) of the Code. If a member is a participant under any qualified defined contributions plan that is required to be taken into account for the purposes of the limitation contained in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, the annual benefit payable under this Article shall be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(e) prior to making any reduction under the defined contribution plan provided by the employer. However, with respect to a member who has benefits accrued under this Article but whose benefit had not commenced as of December 31, 1999, the combined plan limitation contained in Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be applied to such member for calendar years commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

On and after September 8, 2009, and for all Plan years to which the minimum distribution rules of the Internal Revenue Code are applicable, with respect to any member who has terminated employment, the Plan shall comply with federal income tax minimum distribution rules by applying a reasonable and good faith interpretation to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

This subsection applies to distributions and rollovers from the Plan. The Plan does not have mandatory distributions within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code. With respect to distributions from the Plan and notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan to the contrary that would otherwise limit a distributee’s election under this Article, a distributee (including, after December 31, 2006, a non-spouse beneficiary if that non-spouse beneficiary elects a direct rollover only to an inherited traditional or Roth IRA as permitted under applicable federal law) may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Plan administrator, to have any portion of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct rollover. As used in this subsection, an “eligible retirement plan” means an individual retirement account described in Section 408(a) of the Code, an individual retirement annuity described in Section 408(b) of the Code, an annuity plan described in Section 403(a) of the Code, on and after January 1, 2009, a Roth IRA, or a qualified trust described in Section 401(a) of the Code, that accepts the distributee’s eligible rollover distribution. Effective on and after January 1, 2002, an eligible retirement plan also means an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Code and an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state and which agrees to separately account for amounts transferred into that plan from this Plan. As used in this subsection, a “direct rollover” is a payment by the Plan to the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee. Provided, an eligible rollover distribution is any distribution of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee, except that an eligible rollover distribution shall not include: any distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments (not less frequently than annually) made for the life (or life expectancy) of the distributee or the joint lives (or joint life expectancies) of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary, or for a specified period of 10 years or more; any distribution to the extent such distribution is required under section 401(a)(9) of the Code; and the portion of any distribution that is not includible in gross income (determined without regard to the exclusion for net realized appreciation with respect to employer securities). Effective as of January 1, 2002, and notwithstanding the exclusion of any after-tax portion from such a rollover distribution in the preceding sentence, a portion of a distribution shall not fail to be an eligible rollover distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax employee contributions which are not includible in gross income. That portion may be transferred, pursuant to applicable federal law, to an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or (b) of the Code, to a qualified defined benefit plan, or to a qualified defined contribution plan described in Section 401(a), 403(a), or 403(b) of the Code that agrees to separately account for amounts so transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of such distribution which is includible in gross income and the portion of such distribution which is not so includible. The definition of eligible retirement plan shall also apply in the case of a distribution to surviving spouse, or to a spouse or former spouse who is the alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as defined in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a court-ordered equitable distribution of marital property, as provided under

G.S. 50-20.1

. Effective on and after January 1, 2007, notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, a nonspouse beneficiary of a deceased member may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator of the Board of Trustees of this Retirement System, to directly roll over any portion of the beneficiary’s distribution from the Retirement System; however, such rollover shall conform with the provisions of section 402(c)(11) of the Code.

History.

1989, c. 276, s. 2; 1993, c. 531, s. 4; 1995, c. 361, s. 3; 2002-71, s. 4; 2009-66, s. 1(d); 2012-130, s. 4(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2012-130, s. 4(b), effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (a), added the fourth paragraph, and rewrote subsections (c) and (d).

§ 128-38.3.
Deduction for payments allowed.

Any beneficiary who is a member of a domiciled employees’ or retirees’ association that has at least 2,000 members, the majority of whom are active or retired employees of employers as defined in

G.S. 128-21(11)

, may authorize, in writing, the periodic deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits a designated lump sum to be paid to the employees’ or retirees’ association. The authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary. A plan of deductions pursuant to this section shall become void if the employees’ or retirees’ association engages in collective bargaining with the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any local school administrative unit.

Any beneficiary eligible for coverage under the State Health Plan may also authorize, in writing, the monthly deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits of a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan for any dependent whom the beneficiary wishes to cover under the State Health Plan. In the event that the beneficiary’s own State Health Plan coverage is contributory, in whole or in part, the beneficiary may also authorize a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan on behalf of the beneficiary. In addition, a beneficiary may similarly authorize the deduction for supplemental voluntary insurance benefits, provided that the deduction is authorized by the Department of State Treasurer and is payable to a company with which the Department of State Treasurer has or had an exclusive contractual relationship. Any such authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary.

For local employers who made arrangements with the Retirement System prior to January 1, 2017, any beneficiary who is a retiree from an employer in the Retirement System under this Article may authorize the periodic deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits as designated lump sum to be paid to the beneficiary’s former employer for the purpose of providing health benefits. The authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary, and proof of the authorization must be available on request of the Department of the State Treasurer. The Department of State Treasurer is prohibited from making any arrangements to deduct from a beneficiary’s retirement benefits an amount to be paid to the beneficiary’s former employer for the purpose of providing health benefits.

History.

2001-424, s. 32.31; 2002-126, s. 6.4(b); 2012-178, s. 4(b); 2017-128, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-178, s. 4(b), effective July 1, 2012, in the section head, substituted “payments” for “payment to certain employees’ associations”; designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2017-128, s. 3, effective July 20, 2017, added subsection (c).

§ 128-38.4.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies committed while serving as elected government official.

Except as provided in G.S. 128-26(w), the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under the federal laws listed in subsection (b) of this section or the laws of this State listed in subsection (c) of this section if all of the following apply:

The federal or State offense is committed while serving as an elected government official.

The conduct on which the federal or State offense is based is directly related to the member’s service as an elected government official.

The federal offenses covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of 18 U.S.C. § 201 (Bribery of public officials and witnesses), 18 U.S.C. § 286 (Conspiracy to defraud the Government with respect to claims), 18 U.S.C. § 287 (False, fictitious or fraudulent claims), 18 U.S.C. § 371 (Conspiracy to commit offense or to defraud United States), 18 U.S.C. § 597 (Expenditures to influence voting), 18 U.S.C. § 599 (Promise of appointment by candidate), 18 U.S.C. § 606 (Intimidation to secure political contributions), 18 U.S.C. § 641 (Public money, property, or records), 18 U.S.C. § 666 (Embezzlement and theft), 18 U.S.C. § 1001 (Statements or entries generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1341 (Frauds and swindles), 18 U.S.C. § 1343 (Fraud by wire, radio, or television), 18 U.S.C. § 1503 (Influencing or injuring officer or juror generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1951 (Interference with commerce by threats or violence), 18 U.S.C. § 1952 (Interstate and foreign travel or transportation in aid of racketeering enterprises), 18 U.S.C. § 1956 (Laundering of monetary instruments), 18 U.S.C. § 1962 (Prohibited activities), or section 7201 of the Internal Revenue Code (Attempt to evade or defeat tax).

Reserved for future codification purposes.

The offenses under the laws of this State covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of any of the following provisions of the General Statutes:

Article 29 of Chapter 14, Bribery.

Article 30 of Chapter 14, Obstructing Justice.

Article 30A of Chapter 14, Secret Listening.

G.S. 14-228

, Buying and selling offices.

Part 1 of Article 14 of Chapter 120, Code of Legislative Ethics.

Article 20 of Chapter 163, Absentee Ballot.

Article 22 of Chapter 163, Regulation of Election Campaigns — Corrupt Practices and Other Offenses Against the Elective Franchise.

G.S. 14-90

, Embezzlement of property received by virtue of office or employment.

G.S. 14-91

, Embezzlement of State property by public officers and employees.

G.S. 14-92

, Embezzlement of funds by public officers and trustees.

G.S. 14-99

, Embezzlement of taxes by officers.

G.S. Subsection (a) of

G.S. 14-454.1

, Accessing government computers.

Subsection (a1) of

G.S. 14-455

, Damaging computers, computer programs, computer systems, computer networks, and resources.

G.S. 14-456.1

, Denial of government computer services to an authorized user.

Perjury or false information as follows:

Perjury committed under

G.S. 14-209

in falsely denying the commission of an act that constitutes an offense within the purview of an offense listed in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section.

Subornation of perjury committed under

G.S. 14-210

in connection with the false denial of another as specified by subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Perjury under Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

All monies forfeited under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund.

History.

2007-179, s. 2(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-84, s. 2(b); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes conformed references in subdivision subdivision (c)(1) and sub-subdivision (c)(2)c.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (c).